Indiana, session 2026, HB1420.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-10.3-8-10.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 10.5. (a) This section applies
when a member is a party to an action for dissolution of marriage
under IC 31-15-2.
(b) Notwithstanding sections 9 and 10 of this chapter, a court
may do either of the following in a dissolution decree (as defined in
IC 31-9-2-41):
(1) Order the assignment of all or part of the monthly benefits
that the member is entitled to receive to another party in the
action for dissolution of marriage.
(2) Order the garnishment and transfer of all or part of the
monthly benefits that the member is entitled to receive to
another party in the action for dissolution of marriage.
(c) The board shall pay the amounts ordered under subsection
(b):
(1) at the time the member:
2026 IN 1420—LS 6605/DI 144


(A) is entitled; or
(B) was entitled;
to receive the amounts;
(2) to the parties specified in the order; and
(3) in the proportionate amounts required by the order.
2026 IN 1420—LS 6605/DI 144